Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.110

Tortious conduct of state or its agents—Presentment and filing of claim prerequisite to suit.

No action subject to the claim filing requirements of RCW 4.92.100 shall be commenced against the state, or against any state officer, employee, or volunteer, acting in such capacity, for damages arising out of tortious conduct until sixty calendar days have elapsed after the claim is presented to the office of risk management in the department of enterprise services. The applicable period of limitations within which an action must be commenced shall be tolled during the sixty calendar day period. For the purposes of the applicable period of limitations, an action commenced within five court days after the sixty calendar day period has elapsed is deemed to have been presented on the first day after the sixty calendar day period elapsed.

[ 2015 c 225 s 5; 2009 c 433 s 3; 2006 c 82 s 2; 2002 c 332 s 13; 1989 c 419 s 14; 1986 c 126 s 8; 1979 c 151 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 3; 1963 c 159 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.